California, session 20252026, AB963.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1776.1 is added to the Labor Code, to read:1776.1. (a) An owner or developer undertaking any work, subject to the prevailing wage requirements of this chapter, shall make the following records with respect to that work available upon request to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement of the Department of Industrial Relations, to multiemployer Taft-Hartley trust funds (29 U.S.C. Sec. 186(c)), and to joint labor-management committees established pursuant to the federal Labor Management Cooperation Act of 1978 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 175a):(1) Request for bids.(2) Lists of bids received and total bid amounts.(3) Final executed construction contracts, between the direct contractor and either the owner or developer, demonstrating compliance with contract requirements of this chapter.(4) The names and license numbers of the contractors and subcontractors performing the work.(5) A certified copy of payroll records described in Section 1776 if the owner or developer has possession, custody, or control of these records.(6) If the owner or developer were required to provide an enforceable commitment that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to complete a contract or project, the monthly reports required under Section 2602 of the Public Contract Code.(b) (1) Any records of work performed that are made available under this section shall be redacted only to prevent disclosure of any individual’s social security number.(2) The owner or developer may redact pricing information and other proprietary or confidential information from contracts and subcontracts if that information has not been made public. The names of contractors and subcontractors, the scope of work, and any contractual requirements to pay prevailing wages or use a skilled and trained workforce shall not be redacted.(c) Where the requesting department, trust fund, or joint labor-management committee has identified the documents or information sought with specificity, the owner or developer shall reasonably assist in identifying responsive records.(d) (1) An owner or developer has 30 calendar days in which to comply subsequent to receipt of a written notice requesting the records enumerated in subdivision (a). The requesting and responding parties may agree in writing to an extension of time to respond.(2) In the event that the owner or developer fails to comply with a request from a multiemployer Taft-Hartley trust fund or a joint labor-management committee, the fund or committee may submit a complaint to the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement within 30 calendar days after compliance was required.(3) If the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement receives a complaint pursuant to paragraph (2), the division shall submit to the owner or developer a new written request for the records enumerated in subdivision (a). If the owner or developer fails to comply subsequent to receipt of that new written request from the division within 10 calendar days, the owner or developer shall be subject to a penalty by the Labor Commissioner until strict compliance is effectuated. The penalty shall be one hundred dollars ($100) for each calendar day, or portion thereof, for each worker, starting from the first day following that 10-day period, until strict compliance is effectuated with respect to records described by paragraph (5) of subdivision (a). For records described by paragraphs (1) through (4) and (6) of subdivision (a), the penalty shall be five hundred dollars ($500) for each calendar day, or portion thereof, starting from the first day following that 10-day period, until strict compliance is effectuated. Penalties received pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established by Section 1771.3 and shall be used only for the purposes specified in that section.(4) The director shall adopt rules consistent with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) governing the release of these records, including the establishment of reasonable fees to be charged for reproducing copies of records required by this section.(e) For purposes of this section, an “owner or developer” includes a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity, that enters into a contract with a contractor to perform work on a project first advertised for bid or, if there is no bid advertisement date, executed on or after January 1, 2026, but does not include the state or a political subdivision.(f) (1) A multiemployer Taft-Hartley trust fund or a joint labor-management committee shall not disclose or share a certified copy of payroll records or an executed construction contract received under this section and shall maintain them as confidential.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a multiemployer Taft-Hartley trust fund or a joint labor-management committee may share a certified copy of payroll records or an executed construction contract with the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement or an awarding agency to provide evidence of a violation of this chapter.(g) If a request for records is made pursuant to subdivision(a), the request shall be made within three years of the completion of the work subject to the prevailing wage requirements of this chapter.